Illinois, session 104th, HB1008.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Service Member Civil Relief Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (330 ILCS 63/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois Service Member Civil Relief Act.9(Source: P.A. 97-913, eff. 1-1-13.)